Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.800

Code city retaining former second-class city plan—Elective officers.

In a city initially classified as a second-class city prior to January 1, 1993, that retained its second-class city plan of government when the city reorganized as a noncharter code city, the elective officers shall consist of a mayor, twelve councilmembers, a city clerk, and a city treasurer.

[ 1994 c 81 s 24; 1987 c 3 s 6; 1965 c 7 s 35.23.020. Prior: 1949 c 83 s 1; 1907 c 241 s 2; RRS s 9007. Formerly RCW 35.23.020.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 3: See note following RCW 3.70.010.